Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-6507
Wellness program; restrictions.

(1) A pet insurer or insurance producer shall not market a wellness program as pet insurance.

(2) If a pet insurer or insurance producer sells a wellness program:

(a) The purchase of the wellness program shall not be a requirement to the purchase of pet insurance;

(b) The costs of the wellness program shall be separate and identifiable from any pet insurance policy sold by a pet insurer or insurance producer;

(c) The terms and conditions for the wellness program shall be separate from any pet insurance policy sold by a pet insurer or insurance producer;

(d) The products or coverage available through a wellness program shall not duplicate products or coverages available through the pet insurance policy;

(e) The advertising of the wellness program shall not be misleading; and

(f) The pet insurer or insurance producer shall provide a written disclosure to consumers in twelve-point bold font that includes:

(i) A statement that wellness programs are not insurance;

(ii) The mailing address, toll-free telephone number, and website of the Department of Insurance; and

(iii) The address and customer service telephone number of the pet insurer or insurance producer of record.

(3) Coverages included in the pet insurance policy contract described as wellness benefits are insurance.

Laws 2023, LB296, § 7.